Wisconsin, session 2025, SB34.
do enact as follows:SB34,11Section 1. 8.35 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB34,2,728.35 (1m) (a) A person who files nomination papers with the commission for 3an office other than district attorney to be filled at the general election does not 4qualify under sub. (1) to appear on the ballot at the partisan primary or general 5election, and the person’s name shall not appear on the ballot, if, before the June 10 6preceding the partisan primary or before the 4th Tuesday in August preceding the 7general election, the person does all of the following:SB34,2,981. Files a sworn statement with the commission on a form prescribed by the 9commission attesting that the person withdraws his or her candidacy.SB34,2,11102. Pays a fee of $1,000 to the commission if the person is a candidate for 11national or statewide office.SB34,2,13123. Pays a fee of $250 to the commission if the person is a candidate for an office 13not elected statewide.SB34,3,31(b) The commission shall establish and implement a process by which the 2commission verifies the authenticity of sworn statements filed with the commission 3under par. (a) 1.SB34,24Section 2. 12.13 (3) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB34,3,6512.13 (3) (ag) Intentionally make or file a false statement withdrawing a 6person’s candidacy under s. 8.35 (1m) (a) 1.SB34,37Section 3. 12.60 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB34,3,8812.60 (1) (am) Whoever violates s. 12.13 (3) (ag) is guilty of a Class G felony.SB34,3,99